Louisiana, session 2026, HB623.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:914.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§914.1. Three-tier system for vapor products
A.(1) No Louisiana-permitted manufacturer of vapor products shall do any
of the following:
(a) Hold a retail dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the purpose
of selling vapor products to Louisiana consumers.
(b) Hold a wholesale dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the
purpose of selling vapor products to Louisiana consumers.
(c) Possess any direct or indirect financial interest in a Louisiana-permitted
wholesale dealer or retail dealer of vapor products.
(2) No Louisiana-permitted wholesale dealer of vapor products shall hold a
retail dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the purpose of selling vapor
products to Louisiana consumers.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 623 ENROLLED
(3) No Louisiana-permitted retail dealer of vapor products shall do either of
the following:
(a) Hold a wholesale dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the
purpose of selling vapor products to other Louisiana-permitted retail dealers.
(b) Purchase vapor products from any person other than a
Louisiana-permitted wholesaler dealer.
B.(1) A Louisiana-permitted manufacturer shall not sell vapor products
directly to a Louisiana-permitted retail dealer for resale to Louisiana consumers.
(2) Direct shipment of vapor products from a Louisiana-permitted
manufacturer to a Louisiana-permitted retail dealer is prohibited.
(3) Direct to consumer shipment of vapor products from a manufacturer or
out-of-state or in-state seller to a Louisiana consumer is prohibited.
(4) A Louisiana-permitted wholesale dealer may sell or distribute vapor
products or any other product covered by this Chapter to a Louisiana-permitted retail
dealer that is an affiliated entity of the wholesale dealer. The term "affiliated entity"
as used in this Section shall mean any person or entity that directly or indirectly
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or entity.
C. The provisions of this Section do not apply to lawful marijuana or
marijuana products authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. and regulated by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, a person
may receive delivery of a vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or smokeless
tobacco product from a third party contracted to deliver goods sold over the internet
from a physical Louisiana retail establishment in this state which is licensed to sell
these products, provided the delivery occurs in person and the third party verifies the
age of the recipient at the time of delivery.
Section 2. Section 2 of the Act that originated as House Bill 782 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Legislature shall be applicable to taxable periods beginning on or after
January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 623 ENROLLED
Section 3. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.